Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.436

Grain indemnity fund program—Advisory committee.

(1) There is hereby created a grain indemnity fund advisory committee consisting of six members to be appointed by the director. The director shall make appointments to the committee no later than seven days following the date this section becomes effective pursuant to RCW 22.09.405. Of the initial appointments, three shall be for two-year terms and three shall be for three-year terms. Thereafter, appointments shall be for three-year terms, each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term preceding it. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the predecessor's term.

(2) The committee shall be composed of two producers primarily engaged in the production of agricultural commodities, two licensed grain dealers, and two licensed grain warehouse operators.

(3) The committee shall meet at such places and times as it shall determine and as often as necessary to discharge the duties imposed upon it. Each committee member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel and subsistence expense under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The expenses of the committee and its operation shall be paid from the grain indemnity fund.

(4) The committee shall have the power and duty to advise the director concerning assessments, administration of the grain indemnity fund, and payment of claims from the fund.

[ 2011 c 336 s 630; 1987 c 509 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.